Oklahoma, session 2025, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-203 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:

Req. No. 403 Page 1


1. “Library” means a school library, media program, classroom


library, or any other collection of books or other materials, print


or digital, that are maintained by a school district or charter


school or its employees for use by students and that do not qualify


as textbooks approved by the State Textbook Committee pursuant to


Sections 16-101 through 16-124 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “School library” means the library maintained by a school


district or charter school for use by students;


3. “Pornographic” means:


a. depictions or descriptions of sexual conduct which are


patently offensive as found by the average person


applying contemporary community standards, considering


the youngest age of students with access to the


material,


b. materials that, taken as a whole, have as the dominant


theme an appeal to prurient interest in sex as found


by the average person applying contemporary community


standards, and


c. a reasonable person would find the material, taken as


a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic,


educational, political, or scientific purposes or


values considering the youngest age of students with


access to the material; and



Req. No. 403 Page 2


4. “Sexualized content” means material that is not strictly


pornographic but otherwise contains excessive sexual material in


light of the educational value of the material and in light of the


youngest age of students with access to the material.


B. By October 1, 2025, and by every October 1 thereafter, each


school district and charter school shall submit to the State


Department of Education a complete listing of all books and other


materials available in its school library. To fulfill the


requirement of this subsection, a school district or charter school


superintendent may submit an attestation that the public online


school library catalog or catalogs contain a complete and accurate


list of books and other materials accompanied by the website for


accessing the relevant catalog or catalogs.


C. A library in a school district or charter school shall be


prohibited from having any pornographic materials or sexualized


content accessible to students under the age of eighteen (18).


D. Each school district and charter school shall have a written


policy for reviewing the educational suitability and age-appropriate


nature of any material in a library and for receiving and responding


to complaints regarding books and other materials in libraries.


E. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a student from


reading, owning, possessing, or discussing any book obtained without


the assistance or encouragement of a school district or charter


school, its employees, or its libraries; provided, however, nothing

Req. No. 403 Page 3


in this section shall be construed to allow a student to bring


pornographic material or sexualized content on the grounds of a


school district or charter school.


F. 1. The parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in a


school district or charter school may report suspected violations of


the provisions of this section to the State Department of Education.


The report shall include a written complaint summarizing the alleged


violation including the time, date, and location of the alleged


violation and the identity of any person involved. The report shall


include a copy of any complaint submitted to the school district or


charter school and any related response.


2. Within fourteen (14) business days of receiving a report


pursuant to this subsection, the State Department of Education shall


notify the school district or charter school of the alleged


violation and provide an opportunity to respond.


3. The State Department of Education shall conduct an


investigation to determine whether a violation occurred. The


Department shall notify the parent or legal guardian who submitted


the report and the school district or charter school of the results


of the investigation.


4. If the Department determines a violation occurred, the


school district or charter school shall have fourteen (14) business


days to request a hearing before the State Board of Education. The


Board shall review the alleged violation, the results of the

Req. No. 403 Page 4


Department’s investigation, and the response from the school


district or charter school and vote on whether to uphold the


Department’s determination.


5. If the State Board of Education votes to uphold the State


Department of Education’s determination, the Board is authorized to


report a school district or charter school as deficient on the


accreditation report for noncompliance with the provisions of this


section. Upon a finding of noncompliance with the provisions of


subsections B and C of this section by the State Board of Education,


the noncompliant school district or charter school shall receive a


five percent (5%) reduction in state funding for the fiscal year


following the fiscal year of noncompliance.


G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-403 EB 12/11/2024 3:07:32 PM







Req. No. 403 Page 5